test/src/gt-desc-yamls/N-repaenj12_gt-desc.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - repäń: # Noun (12) repäń 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     repäń+N+Sg+Nom: repäń
     repäń+N+Sg+Gen: rebäse
     repäń+N+Sg+Par: rebäst
     repäń+N+Sg+Ill: [rebäsehe, rebäsede]
     repäń+N+Sg+Ine: [rebäsen, rebäseh, rebäsehn]
     repäń+N+Sg+Ela: rebäsest
     repäń+N+Sg+All: rebäsele
     repäń+N+Sg+Ade: rebäsel
     repäń+N+Sg+Abl: rebäselt
     repäń+N+Sg+Tra: rebäses
     repäń+N+Sg+Ter: rebäseniq
     repäń+N+Sg+Abe: rebäseldäq
     repäń+N+Sg+Com: rebäsegaq
     repäń+N+Pl+Nom: rebäseq
     repäń+N+Pl+Gen: [rebäside, rebäsiide, rebäste]
     repäń+N+Pl+Par: [rebäsit, rebäsiid]
     repäń+N+Pl+Ill: [rebäsihe, rebäsiihe, rebäside, rebäsiide, rebästehe, rebästede]
     repäń+N+Pl+Ine: [rebäsin, rebäsiin, rebäsih, rebäsiih, rebäsihn, rebäsiihn, rebästen, rebästeh, rebästehn]
     repäń+N+Pl+Ela: [rebäsist, rebäsiist, rebästest]
     repäń+N+Pl+All: [rebäsile, rebäsiile, rebästele]
     repäń+N+Pl+Ade: [rebäsil, rebäsiil, rebästel]
     repäń+N+Pl+Abl: [rebäsilt, rebäsiilt, rebästelt]
     repäń+N+Pl+Tra: [rebäsis, rebäsiis, rebästes]
     repäń+N+Pl+Ter: [rebäsiniq, rebäsiiniq, rebästeniq]
     repäń+N+Pl+Abe: [rebäsildäq, rebäsiildäq, rebästeldäq]
     repäń+N+Pl+Com: [rebäsidegaq, rebäsiidegaq, rebästegaq]
